fr: Édition de flipper compatible: Classique; Édition collector (CE); Personnalisé; Édition limitée (LE); Premium; Pro; Édition signature; Édition spéciale (SE); Standard; Édition vault; Autre
pl: Kompatybilna wersja maszyny pinballowej: Klasyczny; Edycja kolekcjonerska (CE); Niestandardowe terminy; Edycja limitowana (LE); Premium; Profesjonalny; Edycja sygnowana; Edycja specjalna (SE); Standard; Edycja skarbca; Inne
nb: Kompatibel flipperspillutgave: Klassisk; Samlerutgave (CE); Tilpasset; Begrenset utgave (LE); Premium; Pro; Signaturutgave; Spesialutgave (SE); Standard; Hvelvutgave; Annet
bg-BG: Съвместима версия на флипера: Класически; Колекционерско издание (CE); Персонализиран; Лимитирано издание (LE); Премиум; Про; Издание с подпис; Специално издание (SE); Стандартно; Издание Vault; Други
en: Compatible pinball machine edition: Classic; Collector's Edition (CE); Custom; Limited Edition (LE); Premium; Pro; Signature Edition; Special Edition (SE); Standard; Vault Edition; Other
zh-CN: 兼容的弹球机版本: 经典; 收藏版 (CE); 定制; 限量版 (LE); 优质; 专业; 签名版; 特别版 (SE); 标准; 典藏版; 其他
pt-BR: Edição compatível da máquina de pinball: Clássico; Edição de colecionador (CE); Personalizada; Edição limitada (LE); Premium; Pro; Edição assinatura; Edição especial (SE); Padrão; Edição vault; Outro
de: Kompatible Flipperautomaten-Edition: Klassisch; Sammlerausgabe (CE); Maßgeschneidert; Limitierte Ausgabe (LE); Premium; Professionell; Signatur-Ausgabe; Sonderausgabe (SE); Standard; Tresor-Ausgabe; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Suderinama fliperio mašinos versija: Klasika; Kolekcionierių leidimas (CE); Pasirinktinis; Ribotas leidimas (LE); „Premium“; „Pro“; Parašo leidimas; Specialus leidimas (SE); Standartinis; Saugyklos leidimas; Kita
hu: Kompatibilis flippergépkiadás: Klasszikus; Gyűjtői kiadás (CE); Egyedi; Limitált kiadás (LE); Prémium; Professzionális; Aláírás kiadás; Különleges kiadás (SE); Normál; Páncél kiadás; Egyéb
zh-TW: 相容彈珠台版本: 經典; 收藏版（CE）; 客製化; 限量版（LE）; 高級; 專業版; 簽名版; 特別版（SE）; 標準; 典藏版; 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva flipperikoneen versio: Klassinen; Keräilijäversio (CE); Mukautettu; Rajoitettu erä (LE); Premium; Pro; Allekirjoitusversio; Erikoisversio (SE); Tavallinen; Holviversio; Muu
vi: Phiên bản máy pinball tương thích: Cổ điển; Phiên bản sưu tầm (CE); Tùy chỉnh; Phiên bản giới hạn (LE); Cao cấp; Chuyên nghiệp; Phiên bản chữ ký; Phiên bản đặc biệt (SE); Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Phiên bản kho báu; Khác
pt-PT: Edição compatível da máquina de pinball: Clássico; Edição de colecionador (CE); À medida; Edição limitada (LE); Premium; Pro; Edição assinatura; Edição especial (SE); Padrão; Edição cofre; Outro
th: รุ่นเครื่องพินบอลที่ใช้ร่วมได้: แบบคลาสสิก; ฉบับสะสม (CE); ปรับเข้ารูป; ฉบับจำกัด (LE); พรีเมียม; โปร; ฉบับลายเซ็น; ฉบับพิเศษ (SE); มาตรฐาน; ฉบับ Vault; อื่นๆ
tr: Uyumlu langırt makinesi sürümü: Klasik; Koleksiyoncu sürümü (CE); Özel; Sınırlı sürüm (LE); Premium; Pro; İmza sürümü; Özel sürüm (SE); Standart; Vault sürümü; Diğer
sv: Kompatibel flipperspelsutgåva: Klassisk; Samlaredition (CE); Anpassad; Begränsad utgåva (LE); Premium; Pro; Signaturutgåva; Specialutgåva (SE); Standard; Valvutgåva; Övrigt
ja: 対応ピンボールマシンエディション: クラシック; コレクターズエディション（CE）; カスタム; リミテッドエディション（LE）; プレミアム; プロ; シグネチャーエディション; スペシャルエディション（SE）; スタンダード; ボールトエディション; その他
sk-SK: Kompatibilná edícia flippera: Klasický; Zberateľská edícia (CE); Prispôsobený; Limitovaná edícia (LE); Prémiový; Pro; Podpisová edícia; Špeciálna edícia (SE); Štandardný; Trezorová edícia; Iné
cs: Kompatibilní edice pinballového automatu: Klasický; Sběratelská edice (CE); Vlastní; Limitovaná edice (LE); Premium; Pro; Podpisová edice; Speciální edice (SE); Standardní; Trezorová edice; Jiné
ko: 호환 가능한 핀볼 머신 에디션: 클래식; 컬렉터스 에디션(CE); 커스텀; 리미티드 에디션(LE); 프리미엄; 프로; 시그니처 에디션; 스페셜 에디션(SE); 표준; 볼트 에디션; 기타
sl-SI: Združljiva izdaja fliperja: Klasičen; Zbirateljska izdaja (CE); Po meri; Omejena izdaja (LE); Premium; Profesionalna; Podpisana izdaja; Posebna izdaja (SE); Standarden; Vault izdaja; Drugo
nl: Compatibele flipperkast editie: Klassiek; Collector's Edition (CE); Aangepast; Limited Edition (LE); Premium; Pro; Signature Edition; Special Edition (SE); Standaard; Vault Edition; Andere
hr-HR: Kompatibilna edicija flipera: Klasični; Kolekcionarsko izdanje (CE); Prilagođeni; Ograničeno izdanje (LE); Vrhunska; Profesionalni; Potpis izdanje; Specijalno izdanje (SE); Standardni; Vault izdanje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Ediție de mașină de pinball compatibilă: Clasic; Ediție de colecție (CE); Personalizat; Ediție limitată (LE); Premium; Pro; Ediție semnătură; Ediție specială (SE); Standard; Ediție seif; Altele
da: Kompatibel flippermaskineudgave: Klassisk; Samlerudgave (CE); Skræddersyet; Begrænset udgave (LE); Premium; Pro; Signaturudgave; Specialudgave (SE); Standard; Vault-udgave; Andet
it: Edizione compatibile della macchina flipper: Classico; Edizione del collezionista (CE); Personalizzato; Edizione limitata (LE); Premium; Pro; Edizione firma; Edizione speciale (SE); Standard; Edizione vault; Altro
es: Edición de máquina de pinball compatible: Clásico; Edición de coleccionista (CE); Personalizado; Edición limitada (LE); Prémium; Pro; Edición de firma; Edición especial (SE); Estándar; Edición de bóveda; Otros
ru: Совместимая редакция пинбольного автомата: Классика; Коллекционное издание (CE); Индивидуальный; Ограниченное издание (LE); Премиум; Профессиональный; Подписное издание; Специальное издание (SE); Стандартный; Издание Vault; Другой
el: Συμβατή έκδοση μηχανής φλίπερ: Κλασική; Έκδοση συλλέκτη (CE); Custom; Περιορισμένη έκδοση (LE); Ανώτερης ποιότητας; Pro; Έκδοση υπογραφής; Ειδική έκδοση (SE); Κανονικό; Έκδοση vault; Άλλο